Washington statutes.
RCW 18.92.013

Dispensing of drugs by registered or licensed personnel.

(1) A veterinarian legally prescribing drugs may delegate to a registered veterinary medication clerk, while under the veterinarian's direct supervision, certain nondiscretionary functions defined by the board and used in the preparing of legend and nonlegend drugs (except controlled substances as defined in or under chapter 69.50 RCW) associated with the practice of veterinary medicine. A veterinarian legally prescribing drugs may delegate to a licensed veterinary technician, while under the veterinarian's indirect supervision, certain nondiscretionary functions defined by the board and used in the preparing of legend drugs, nonlegend drugs, and controlled substances associated with the practice of veterinary medicine. Upon final approval of the packaged prescription following a direct physical inspection of the packaged prescription for proper formulation, packaging, and labeling by the veterinarian, the veterinarian may delegate the delivery of the prescription to a registered veterinary medication clerk or licensed veterinary technician, while under the veterinarian's indirect supervision. Dispensing of drugs by veterinarians, licensed veterinary technicians, and registered veterinary medication clerks shall meet the applicable requirements of chapters 18.64, 69.40, 69.41, and 69.50 RCW and is subject to inspection by the pharmacy quality assurance commission investigators.

(2) A licensed veterinary technician may administer legend drugs under chapter 69.41 RCW and controlled substances under chapter 69.50 RCW under indirect supervision of a veterinarian.

(3) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Direct supervision" means the veterinarian is on the premises and is quickly and easily available; and

(b) "Indirect supervision" means the veterinarian is not on the premises but has given written or oral instructions for the delegated task.

[ 2013 c 19 s 42; 2009 c 136 s 1; 2007 c 235 s 5; 2000 c 93 s 8; 1993 c 78 s 2.]